test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yolytseTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ёльцьʼ: # Noun 'time /(fin) aika' - partial paradigm /Type 30/
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom: ёльцьʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc: ёльцямʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen: ёльцяʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat: ёльцяндʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc: ёльцьӈгана
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl: ёльцьӈгад
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros: ёльцьмана
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom: ёльцяӈгʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc: ёльцяӈгʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen: ёльцяӈгʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom: ёльцяˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc: ёльце
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen: ёльцеˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat: ёльцяӈгˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc: ёльцьӈгаˮна
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl: ёльцьӈгат
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros: ёльцеˮмна
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ёльцям, ёльцьми]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ёльцям, ёльцьми]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ёльцян, ёльцьни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈган, ёльцьӈгани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈганан, ёльцьӈганани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгадан, ёльцьӈгадани, ёльцьӈгадни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ёльцьманан, ёльцьманани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгаюн, ёльцьӈгаюни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгаюн, ёльцьӈгаюни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгаюн, ёльцьӈгаюни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ёльцен, ёльцени]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ёльцен, ёльцени]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ёльцеˮн, ёльцеˮни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгаˮн, ёльцьӈгаˮни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгаˮнан, ёльцьӈгаˮнани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ёльцьӈгатан, ёльцьӈгатани, ёльцьӈгатни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ёльцеˮмнан, ёльцеˮмнани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ёльцял
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ёльцянд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ёльцянд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ёльцьӈганд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгананд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгаданд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ёльцьмананд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгаюд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгаюд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгают
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ёльцед
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ёльцед
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ёльцет
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгат
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгаˮнат
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ёльцьӈгатат
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ёльцеˮмнат
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [ёльцянда, ёльцьнда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [ёльцянда, ёльцьнда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [ёльцянда, ёльцьнда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ёльцьӈганда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгананда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгаданда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ёльцьмананда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгаюда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгаюда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгаюта
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ёльцеда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ёльцеда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ёльцета
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгата
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ёльцьӈгаˮната
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ёльцьӈгатата, ёльцьӈгатта]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ёльцеˮмната
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ёльцьмиʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ёльцьми
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ёльцьмиʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ёльцьми
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ёльцьниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ёльцьни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ёльцьӈганиʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгани
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгананиʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈганани
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ёльцьӈгаданиʼ, ёльцьӈгадниʼ]
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ёльцьӈгадани, ёльцьӈгадни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ёльцьмананиʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ёльцьманани
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгаюниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгаюни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгаюниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгаюни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгаюниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгаюни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ёльцениʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ёльцени
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ёльцениʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ёльцени
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ёльцеˮниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ёльцеˮни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгаˮниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгаˮни
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ёльцьӈгаˮнаниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ёльцьӈгаˮнани
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ёльцьӈгатаниʼ, ёльцьӈгатниʼ]
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ёльцьӈгатани, ёльцьӈгатни]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ёльцеˮмнаниʼ
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ёльцеˮмнани
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ёльцьлиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ёльцьӈганандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгадандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ёльцьманандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгаютиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ёльцетиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ёльцьӈгаˮнатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ёльцьӈгататиʼ, ёльцьӈгаттиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ёльцеˮмнатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ёльцьӈганандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгадандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ёльцьманандиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгаютиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ёльцетиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ёльцьӈгаˮнатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ёльцьӈгататиʼ, ёльцьӈгаттиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ёльцеˮмнатиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ёльцьмаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ёльцьмаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ёльцьнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ёльцьӈганаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгананаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ёльцьӈгаданаˮ, ёльцьӈгаднаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ёльцьмананаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгаюнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгаюнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгаюнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ёльценаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ёльценаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ёльцеˮнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгаˮнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ёльцьӈгаˮнанаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ёльцьӈгатанаˮ, ёльцьӈгатнаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ёльцеˮмнанаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ёльцьлаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: [ёльцяндаˮ, ёльцьндаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [ёльцяндаˮ, ёльцьндаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгандаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ёльцьӈганандаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгадандаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ёльцьманандаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгаюдаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгаюдаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгаютаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ёльцедаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ёльцедаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ёльцетаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгатаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ёльцьӈгаˮнатаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ёльцьӈгататаˮ, ёльцьӈгаттаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ёльцеˮмнатаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [ёльцяндоʼ, ёльцьндоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [ёльцяндоʼ, ёльцьндоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [ёльцяндоʼ, ёльцьндоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгандоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ёльцьӈганандоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгадандоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ёльцьманандоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгаюдоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгаюдоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгаютоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ёльцедоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ёльцедоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ёльцетоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгатоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ёльцьӈгаˮнатоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ёльцьӈгататоʼ, ёльцьӈгаттоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ёльцеˮмнатоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Abs: ёльцянд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ёльцяндав, ёльцьндав, ёльцяндув, ёльцьндув, ёльцяндами, ёльцьндами]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ёльцяндав, ёльцьндав, ёльцяндув, ёльцьндув, ёльцяндами, ёльцьндами]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ёльцяндан, ёльцьндан, ёльцяндани, ёльцьндани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [ёльцяндар, ёльцьндар]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [ёльцяндамд, ёльцьндамд]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [ёльцянданд, ёльцьнданд]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ёльцяндада, ёльцьндада]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [ёльцяндамда, ёльцьндамда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [ёльцянданда, ёльцьнданда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ёльцяндамиʼ, ёльцьндамиʼ]
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [ёльцяндами, ёльцьндами]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ёльцяндамиʼ, ёльцьндамиʼ]
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [ёльцяндами, ёльцьндами]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [ёльцянданиʼ, ёльцьнданиʼ]
#     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [ёльцяндани, ёльцьндани]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [ёльцяндариʼ, ёльцьндариʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [ёльцяндамдиʼ, ёльцьндамдиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [ёльцяндандиʼ, ёльцьндандиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ёльцяндадиʼ, ёльцьндадиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [ёльцяндамдиʼ, ёльцьндамдиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [ёльцяндандиʼ, ёльцьндандиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [ёльцяндаваˮ, ёльцьндаваˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [ёльцяндаваˮ, ёльцьндаваˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [ёльцянданаˮ, ёльцьнданаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [ёльцяндараˮ, ёльцьндараˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [ёльцяндамдаˮ, ёльцьндамдаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [ёльцяндандаˮ, ёльцьндандаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ёльцяндадоʼ, ёльцьндадоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [ёльцяндамдоʼ, ёльцьндамдоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [ёльцяндандоʼ, ёльцьндандоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ёльцяндмʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ёльцянд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцьʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ёльцьниʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцяӈгʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ёльцьмаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [ёльцяндаˮ, ёльцьндаˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцяˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [ёльцяндамзь, ёльцьндамзь]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: [ёльцяндась, ёльцьндась]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцянзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ёльцьнинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: [ёльцяндинзь, ёльцьндинзь]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈганзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ёльцьмаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: [ёльцяндаць, ёльцьндаць]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцяць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцям
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцял
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [ёльцянда, ёльцьнда]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцьмиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцьлиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [ёльцяндиʼ, ёльцьндиʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцьмаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ёльцьлаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [ёльцяндоʼ, ёльцьндоʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьмась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьлась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [ёльцяндась, ёльцьндась]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьминзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьлинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [ёльцяндинзь, ёльцьндинзь]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьмаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ёльцьлаць
